Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1987
Admitted asset standards.

In determining the financial condition of a title insurer transacting the business of title insurance under the Title Insurers Act, the general investment provisions of the Insurers Investment Act shall apply, except that an investment in a title plant or title plants in an amount equal to the actual cost shall be allowed as an admitted asset for title insurers. The aggregate amount of the investment shall not exceed the lesser of twenty percent of admitted assets or forty percent of surplus to policyholders, as shown on the most recent annual statement of the title insurer on file with the director.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 10.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.